District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.33

Registration and inspection fees for weighing and measuring devices.

(a)

The Mayor shall collect fees relating to the registration and inspection of weighing and measuring devices in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The following fees are established for the annual registration and inspection of weighing and measuring devices in the District of Columbia:

(1)

Scales with a capacity of up to 100 pound, $75 (maximum fee per location, $900);

(2)

Scales with a capacity of more than 100 pounds, up to 2,000 pounds, $200;

(3)

Scales with a capacity of more than 2,000 pounds, up to 20,000 pounds, $500;

(4)

Vehicle scales, $1,500;

(5)

Retail engine fuel dispenser meter, $60;

(6)

Bulk petroleum fuel meter, $250;

(7)

Liquefied petroleum gas meter of 3/4 inch diameter or less, $250;

(8)

Liquefied petroleum gas meter of greater than 3/4 inch diameter, $375;

(9)

Wire/Cordage or fabric measuring device, $50;

(10)

Compressed natural gas (per meter), $250;

(11)

Hopper scales, $250;

(12)

Prescription balance electronic/mechanical, $75;

(13)

Jeweler’s balance, $75;

(14)

Yard sticks and tapes measures, $25;

(15)

UPC scanning (per unit), $25.

(c)

The Mayor, by rule, may amend the amount fees set forth in subsection (b) of this section and establish new fees as may be necessary for the registration and inspection of weighing and measuring devices. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

(d)

The Mayor may condemn and take out of service any weighing and measuring device not properly registered pursuant to this section.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1220, ch. 118, § 32a
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 2052, 51 DCR 8441
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2012, 54 DCR 7052
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 194, 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-20 added subsec. (d).
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (b)(1).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2052 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2052 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2012 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Short title of subtitle E of title II of Law 15-205: Section 2051 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle E of title II of the act may be cited as the Registration and Inspection of Weighing and Measuring Devices Amendment Act of 2004.

Short title: Section 2011 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle B of title II of the act may be cited as the “Weights and Measures Device Amendment Act of 2007”.